Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
PART 1 General Provisions

11-1-101.
Short titles.

This Title 11 shall be known as and may be cited as the “Uniform Commercial Code.”

This article shall be known as and may be cited as the “Uniform Commercial Code — General Provisions.”

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—101, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, designated the existing provisions as subsection (a), and added subsection (b).

11-1-102.
Scope of article.

This article shall apply to a transaction to the extent that it is governed by another article of this title.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-1-102, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

11-1-103.
Rules of construction to promote purposes and policies; applicability of supplemental principles of law.

This title shall be liberally construed and applied to promote its underlying purposes and policies which are:

To simplify, clarify, and modernize the law governing commercial transactions;

To permit the continued expansion of commercial practices through custom, usage, and agreement of the parties; and

To make uniform the law among the various jurisdictions.

Unless displaced by the particular provisions of this title, the principles of law and equity, including the law merchant and the law relative to capacity to contract, principal and agent, estoppel, fraud, misrepresentation, duress, coercion, mistake, bankruptcy, and other validating or invalidating cause shall supplement its provisions.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—102, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Code 1981, §11-1-103, as redesignated by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, redesignated former Code Section 11-1-102 as present Code Section 11-1-103 and rewrote this Code section.

11-1-104.
Construction against implicit repeal.

This title being a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter, no part of it shall be deemed to be impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if such construction can reasonably be avoided.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—104, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

11-1-105.
Severability.

If any provision or clause of this title or application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are declared to be severable.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—105, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1081, § 2; Ga. L. 1992, p. 2685, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 633, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1323, § 15; Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 2; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

The 2001 amendment,

effective July 1, 2001, substituted “Law governing perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of security interests and agricultural liens. Code Sections 11-9-301 through 11-9-307.” for “Perfection provisions of the article of this title on secured transactions (Article 9 of this title). Code Section 11-9-103.” in the sixth undesignated paragraph of subsection (2).

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, rewrote this Code section.

11-1-106.
Use of singular and plural; gender.

In this title unless the statutory context otherwise requires:

Words in the singular number include the plural, and words in the plural include the singular; and

Words of any gender also refer to any other gender.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—106, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, rewrote this Code section.

11-1-107.
Section captions.

Section captions are parts of this title.

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—107, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “Any claim or right arising out of an alleged breach can be discharged in whole or in part without consideration by a written waiver or renunciation signed and delivered by the aggrieved party.”

11-1-108.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This article modifies, limits, and supersedes the federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001, et seq., but shall not modify, limit, or supersede Section 101(c) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in Section 103(b) of that act, 15 U.S.C. Section 7003(b).

History. —
Code 1933, § 109A-1—108, enacted by Ga. L. 1962, p. 156, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65.

The 2015 amendment,

effective January 1, 2016, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: “If any provision or clause of this title or application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the title which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this title are declared to be severable.”

11-1-109.
Section captions.

Repealed by Ga. L. 2015, p. 996, § 3A-1/SB 65, effective January 1, 2016.